Ohio, session 136, SB365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.449 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.449. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number eleven between United States route number two hundred twenty-four and Leffingwell road, in Mahoning county, shall be known as the "Trooper Nicholas P. Cayton Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.